Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,107.01
Equity securities insider trading; terms, defined.

As used in sections 44-3,107 to 44-3,114, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Person shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint-stock company, business trust, unincorporated organization, or holding company whose primary purpose is owning or controlling insurance companies. A holding company shall be presumed to have as its primary purpose the owning or controlling of insurance companies if fifty-one percent or more of the assets of the holding company consist of the equity securities of one or more stock insurers, one of which is a domestic stock insurer; and

(2) Officer shall mean president, vice president, treasurer, actuary, secretary, controller, or any other person who performs the company functions corresponding to those performed by any of the foregoing officers.

Laws 1969, c. 368, § 2, p. 1307;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 223.